Mississippi, session 2026, SB2008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 83-9-12, Mississippi Code of 1972: 83-9-12.  An insurer, managed-care company or other payor shall not discriminate against an accredited durable medical equipment supplier providing services prescribed by a patient's health care provider.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an insurer, managed-care company or other payor shall reimburse durable medical equipment no less than state Medicaid rates set for these services on a continuous monthly payment basis for the duration of the medical need throughout a patient's valid prescription period. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.